California, session 20252026, AB2618.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 303.5 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:303.5. A commissioner, for a period of 5 two years after the end of the commissioner’s term of office, shall not be employed by an entity subject to regulation by the commission.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.